Hawaii statutes.
[§201-75] Space vehicles; prohibitions.
Any vehicle launched into space from the land or ocean territory of the State
shall not carry weapons of destruction, nuclear waste materials, or use
radioactive materials as a power source. [L 1990, c 172, §1]

Previous
Vol04_Ch0201-0257
Next